Utah statutes.
20A-5-205.   Delivery of official register.

(1)  Before delivering the official register to the poll workers, the county clerk shall attach the certificate required by law to the book.

(2)  The county clerk shall deliver the official register, its accuracy verified by the county clerk's signature, to a poll worker in each voting precinct by noon on the day before the election.



Amended by Chapter 326, 2006 General Session

